Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1307.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5106. Contracting and consent by certain minors.(a) Requirements to enter contract.--A minor may contract for housing, employment, purchase of an automobile, receipt of a student loan, admission to high school or postsecondary school, obtaining medical care, opening a bank account, admission to a shelter for victims of domestic violence or a homeless shelter and receipt of services as a victim of domestic violence or sexual abuse, including, but not limited to, counseling, court advocacy, financial assistance and other advocacy services, if:(1) The minor is at least 16 years of age.123456789101112131415161718 (2) The minor is a homeless minor.(3) The minor is self-supporting and is without the physical or financial support of a parent or legal guardian.(4) The minor's parent or legal guardian has consented to the minor living independent of the parent's or legal guardian's control. Consent may be expressed or implied as follows:(i) Expressed consent shall be a verbal or written statement made by the parent or legal guardian of the minor displaying approval or agreement that the minor may live independently of the parent's or legal guardian's control.(ii) Implied consent shall be an action made by the parent or legal guardian of the minor that indicates that the parent or legal guardian is unwilling or unable to adequately care for the minor. The actions may include, but are not limited to:(A) barring the minor from the home or otherwise indicating that the minor is not welcome to stay;(B) refusing to provide any or all financial support for the minor; or(C) abusing or neglecting the minor or committing an act of domestic violence against the minor.(b) Contract for automobile insurance.--A homeless minor or a minor who is 16 years of age or older and who is in the legal custody of a county agency under an order of a court of competent jurisdiction may contract for the purchase of automobile insurance with the consent of the county agency or the juvenile court. The minor shall be responsible for paying 20250HB1307PN1501 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the costs of the insurance premiums and shall be liable for damages caused by the minor's negligent operation of a motor vehicle. No county agency, foster parent or entity providing case management of children on behalf of a county agency shall be responsible for paying insurance premiums nor liable for any damages of any kind as a result of the operation of a motor vehicle by the minor.(c) Contract for checking or savings account.--A homeless minor or a minor who is 16 years of age or older and who is in the legal custody of a county agency under an order of a court of competent jurisdiction may contract for the opening of a checking or savings bank account with the consent of the county agency or the juvenile court. The minor shall be responsible for paying all banking-related costs associated with the checking or savings bank account and shall be liable for any and all penalties should the minor violate a banking agreement. No county agency, foster parent or entity providing case management of children on behalf of a county agency shall be responsible for paying bank fees nor liable for any penalties related to violation of a banking agreement.(d) Consent for no-cost emergency shelter, housing and related services.--A homeless minor may consent to no-cost emergency shelter, housing and related services if the homeless minor understands the benefits, responsibilities, risks and limits of the shelter, housing and services and the homeless minor agrees to adhere to the provider's rules and cooperate and participate in the services recommended by the provider if:(1) the provider has not, despite reasonable efforts, been able to contact the homeless minor's parent, legal guardian or legal custodian;20250HB1307PN1501 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) the provider has made contact with the homeless minor's parent, legal guardian or legal custodian and the homeless minor's parent, legal guardian or legal custodian has refused to give consent and, based on the information available to the provider, the provider reasonably believes that the homeless minor would incur harm or would be subject to threatened harm if the homeless minor returned immediately to the home of the parent, legal guardian or legal custodian; or(3) the homeless minor has refused to provide contact information for the homeless minor's parent, legal guardian or legal custodian, and the provider reasonably believes that the homeless minor would incur harm or would be subject to threatened harm if the homeless minor returned immediately to the home of the parent, legal guardian or legal custodian.(e) Duration of consent for no-cost emergency shelter, housing and related services.--Any consent given under subsection (d) by a homeless minor shall, for the duration of the period of shelter or housing and with respect to all services, including medical services, be valid and binding as if the homeless minor had reached the age of majority. The following shall apply:(1) The consent given under subsection (d) shall not be subject to later disaffirmance by reason of the homeless minor's minority.(2) A provider who renders emergency shelter, housing and related services to a homeless minor under and can demonstrate compliance with subsection (d) shall be immune from civil or criminal liability based on the provider's determination to provide the emergency shelter, housing and 20250HB1307PN1501 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related services, provided that, if a provider's assessment and determination or conduct in providing emergency shelter, housing and related services is the result of the provider's gross negligence or willful or wanton acts or omissions, the provider may be held liable for the provider's gross negligence or willful or wanton acts or omissions.(3) A provider who renders emergency shelter, housing and related services to a homeless minor shall document in writing the efforts made to contact the homeless minor's parent, legal guardian or legal custodian.(4) The provider shall report suspected child abuse or neglect to the county agency or the local police department in accordance with this title.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"County agency." As defined in section 6303 (relating to definitions)."Homeless minor." An individual who is under 18 years of age, who lives apart from the individual's parent, legal guardian or legal custodian and who lacks a fixed and regular nighttime residence. The term includes the following:(1) A child or youth who is:(i) sharing the housing of other individuals due to loss of housing, economic hardship or other similar reasons;(ii) living in a motel, hotel, trailer park or camping ground due to the lack of alternative adequate accommodations;(iii) living in an emergency or transitional 20250HB1307PN1501 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shelter; or(iv) abandoned in a hospital.(2) A child or youth who has a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for human beings.(3) A child or youth who is living in a car, park, public space, abandoned building, substandard housing, bus or train station or similar setting.(4) Migratory child, as defined under 20 U.S.C. § 6399 (relating to definitions), living in circumstances under paragraph (1), (2) or (3)."Minor." An individual under 18 years of age."Provider." An organization established to provide emergency shelter to minors and to provide related services, health care or supplies.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1307PN1501 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617